North Dakota, session 69, HB1465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 53-06.1-12 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Except as provided in subsection 2, a gaming tax is imposed on the total adjusted
gross proceeds received by a licensed organization in a quarter and the tax must be
computed and paid to the attorney general on a quarterly basis on the tax return. This
tax must be paid from adjusted gross proceeds and is not part of the allowable
expenses. For a licensed organization with adjusted gross proceeds:
a. Not exceeding fifty thousand dollarsone hundred thousand dollars the tax is one
percent of adjusted gross proceeds.
b. Exceeding fifty thousand dollars one hundred thousand dollars but less than two
hundred thousand dollars the tax is five hundredone thousand dollars plus
twelveeight percent of adjusted gross proceeds exceeding fifty thousandone
hundred thousand dollars.
c. Exceeding two hundred thousand dollars the tax is nine thousand dollars for the
first two hundred thousand dollars and twelve percent of adjusted gross proceeds
exceeding two hundred thousand dollars.
Page No. 1 25.1136.02000